en: Canned salmons
de: Lachs in Dosen, Dosen-Lachs
es: Salmon enlatado
fr: Saumon en conserve, Saumons en conserve, Saumons appertisés
hr: Konzervirani losos
nl: Zalm in blik/pot

en: Canned herrings
bg: Консервирана херинга
de: Heringe in Dosen
es: Arenques enlatados
fi: purkitetut sillit
fr: Harengs en conserve
hr: Konzervirane haringe
it: Aringhe in scatola
nl: Haring in blik/pot
pl: Śledzie w puszce

en: Canned pacific sauries
ru: Консервы из сайры тихоокеанской, Консервы из тихоокеанской сайры, Сайра тихоокеанская консервированная

en: Szczecin paprikash
de: Stettiner Paprikagericht
hr: Szczecin paprikaš
pl: Paprykarz szczeciński
uk: Щецинський паприкаж

en: Fish fillets
bg: Филетирана риба
ca: Peix en filets
da: Fiskefilet
de: Fischfilets, Fischfilet
es: Filetes de pescado
fi: kalafileet
fr: Filets de poissons
hr: Riblji fileti
hu: Halfilé
it: Filetti di pesce
nl: Visfilets
pl: Filety rybne, filet rybny
pt: Filetes de peixe
ru: Рыбные филе
zh: 鱼柳

en: Freshwater fish fillets
fr: Filets de poissons d'eau douce

en: Frozen freshwater fish fillets
fr: Filets de poissons d'eau douce surgelés

en: Marine fish fillets
fr: Filets de poissons de mer

en: Frozen marine fish fillets
fr: Filets de poissons de mer surgelés

en: Farmed fish fillets
fr: Filets de poissons d'élevage

en: Frozen farmed fish fillets
fr: Filets de poissons d'élevage surgelés

en: Fish fingers
bg: Рибени пръчици
de: Fischstäbchen
es: Varitas de pescado
fi: kalapuikot
fr: Batonnets de poisson
hr: Riblji štapići
nl: Visvingers, Vissticks
pl: Paluszki rybne

en: Frozen fish fingers
bg: Замразени рибени пръчици
fr: Batonnets de poisson surgelés

en: Alaska pollock
fr: Lieu d'Alaska cru, Colin d'Alaska
hr: Aljaski pollock
ja: スケトウダラ
zh: 黄线狭鳕

en: Frozen Alaska pollock
fr: Colin d'Alaska surgelé, Lieu d'Alaska surgelé

en: Smoked Alaska pollock
fr: Lieu d'Alaska fumé, Colin d'Alaska fumé

en: Pollack
fr: Lieu jaune, Colin, Lieu jaune cru

en: Pollock fillets
de: Seelachsfilets, Seelachsfilet
fr: Filets de colin
hr: Pollock fileti
it: Filetti di pollock
nl: Koolvisfilets

en: Anchovy
bg: Аншоа
de: Sardellen
es: Anchoa
fi: anjovis
fr: Anchois
hr: inćuni
it: Acciughe
ja: カタクチイワシ科, アンチョビ
nl: Ansjovis
ru: Анчоусы
tr: Hamsi

en: common anchovy
fr: Anchois commun